Utah statutes.
48-3a-1401.   Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact the uniform act upon which this chapter is based.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

